Wyoming, session 2025, SF0178.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-2-802(c) and 21-3-401 by creating
new subsections (e) through (n), by amending and
renumbering (e) as (o) and by creating new subsections (p)
through (w) are amended to read:

21-2-802. Powers and duties; teacher certification;
suspension and revocation; certification fees; disposition
of collected fees; required data submissions to department
of education.

(c) The board may revoke, suspend, deny or refuse to
renew certification for incompetency, conviction of a
felony committed after July 1, 1996, immorality and other
reprehensible conduct or gross neglect of duty or knowing
SF0178

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0348
misrepresentation of information on an application or
resume, upon its own motion or upon the petition of any
local board of trustees. Any person certified by the
professional teaching standards board who engages in fraud,
cheating or unfair practices in assisting students in
performing on screening instruments administered pursuant
to W.S. 21-3-401 or on any assessment administered pursuant
to W.S. 21-2-304(a)(v) may have their professional
certification suspended or revoked by the professional
teaching standards board upon its own motion or upon the
petition of any local board of trustees. Except as provided
in subsection (k) of this section, no certificate shall be
revoked or suspended without a hearing conducted in
accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act,
unless the person holding the certification waives the
right to a hearing.

21-3-401. Reading assessment and intervention
program; defining and exempting high performing school
districts; retention in grade three and four; providing
causes of action.

(e) As used in this section:
SF0178

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0348

(i) "Assessment" means the statewide student
assessment administered pursuant to W.S. 21-2-304(a)(v);

(ii) "Diagnostic instrument" means a specialized
assessment tool utilized to evaluate specific areas of
reading difficulty in students identified through universal
screening;

(iii) "Dyslexia" means a specific learning
disability that is neurobiological in origin, characterized
by difficulty with accurate or fluent word recognition and
by inaccurate spelling and decoding abilities, that often
results in a deficit in the phonological component of
language that may be unexpected in relation to other
cognitive abilities and the provision of effective
classroom instruction. Secondary consequences of "dyslexia"
may include problems in reading comprehension and reduced
reading comprehension and reduced reading experience that
can impede the growth of vocabulary and background
knowledge;

SF0178

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0348
(iv) "High performing district" or "high
performing school district in teaching reading" means a
school district where not less than sixty percent (60%) of
all students score proficient or advanced on the grade
three (3) English language arts portion of the assessment
for not less than two (2) school years within the
immediately preceding three (3) school years;

(v) "Parent" means a parent, guardian or other
person having control of a student. If there is no formal
custody arrangement, "parent" means either parent, but each
school district may create a policy where notices shall go
to both parents or written consent is required of both
parents and may make exceptions to this policy. If there is
a custodial parent and noncustodial parent, unless
otherwise ordered by the court, the noncustodial parent
shall have the same right of access as the parent awarded
custody to any records related to the child or the parties
as provided by W.S. 20-2-201(e). The school district is
encouraged to send notices to the custodial and
noncustodial parent, but failure to achieve notice to the
noncustodial parent shall not prejudice further action
pursuant to this section. Where parental consent is
SF0178

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0348
required, the district shall accept consent only from the
custodial parent, unless otherwise instructed by both the
parents or a court of competent jurisdiction;

(vi) "Reading difficulty" means any difficulty
that causes a student to have a problem with reading or
comprehending written words or texts. "Reading difficulty"
includes dyslexia and other reading difficulties;

(vii) "Universal screener" means an assessment
tool administered to all students at least three (3) times
each school year to identify early signs of reading
difficulties, including dyslexia.

(f) Commencing with school year 2025-2026, when the
assessment results from the spring assessment become
available, the department of education shall publish on the
department's website an up-to-date listing of the high
performing school districts in teaching reading. Copies of
the list shall be sent to each school district for
distribution to its board of trustees and to each member of
the legislature, the legislative service office and other
interested parties as identified by the department. In
SF0178

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0348
implementing this section, when a school district's status
as a high performing district changes, the school district
may continue to use its old status until the next January 1
or July 1, whichever comes first, and then shall change to
using its new status.

(g) For students with an individualized education
program (IEP) pursuant to the Individuals with Disabilities
Education Act, 20 U.S.C.A. § 1400 et seq., or a
substantially similar federal enactment, whose IEP
addresses reading difficulties, the IEP shall be deemed
sufficient to meet the requirements of this section. When
these students complete a reading screening or an
assessment in English language arts for which parental
notification is required pursuant to this section, the
notice shall conform to the requirements of the Individuals
with Disabilities Education Act.

(h) For high performing districts:

(i) Each school district shall develop and
implement or select and implement a reading assessment and
intervention program that screens for signs of reading
SF0178

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0348
difficulties in kindergarten through grade three (3) and
that implements an effective intervention program if
difficulties are found. The program shall include
monitoring and measuring student reading progress to
provide information to inform any intervention. The program
may include the development of an individualized reading
plan. As soon as practical after the screening is
conducted, each school district shall, for each student
showing signs of reading difficulties, provide a copy of
the screening results, including an explanation of the
results, to the parent. The school district shall consider
any comments or suggestions the parent may have concerning
the individualized reading plan. Commencing with school
year 2025-2026, the individualized reading plan for
students in kindergarten through grade two (2) shall, at
the request of the parent, include retention of the student
with reading difficulties in the same grade and, for
students in grades one (1) or two (2), include repeating
identified courses or coursework;

(ii) Within fifteen (15) school days after the
school district receives the assessment results, each
school district shall notify the parent in writing of a
SF0178

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0348
student's performance on the grade three (3) and grade four
(4) English language arts portion of the assessment. The
assessment results shall show whether the student's score
was advanced, proficient, basic or below basic on the
English language arts portion of the assessment and may, if
the school district chooses, include the numeric score. If
the student did not take the English language arts portion
of the statewide student assessment, the school district
shall arrange for an assessment to be taken in lieu of the
English language arts portion of the statewide student
assessment;

(iii) Commencing with school year 2027-2028, for
grade three (3) and commencing with school year 2028-2029
for grade four (4), if the student’s score on the grade
three (3) English language arts portion of the assessment
or the grade four (4) English language arts portion of the
assessment, whichever is the most recent, is basic or below
basic, the school district notification pursuant to this
subsection shall include an invitation to meet with the
student's teachers or other appropriate school personnel to
help develop an individualized reading plan to address that
student's reading problem. The individualized reading plan
SF0178

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0348
required by this paragraph shall be based on an
understanding of the individual student's difficulties with
reading and may include:

(A) Having the student repeat the relevant
grade;

(B) Having the student repeat identified
courses or coursework while advancing to the next grade;

(C) Having the student attend a summer
reading program that is appropriate to address the
student's difficulties with reading;

(D) Securing and paying the cost for a
private tutor. The educational interventions afforded under
this subparagraph may be requested by the parent and shall
not be included without the written consent of the parent;

(E) Other provisions and interventions as
may be useful.

SF0178

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0348
(iv) The school district shall try to obtain
parental consent to the plan developed pursuant to
paragraph (iii) of this subsection. If parental consent is
not obtained, the school district shall implement the
individualized reading plan, except as provided by
subparagraph (iii)(D) of this subsection but the parent has
the right pursuant to subsections (p) and (q) of this
section to seek court ordered changes to the plan. The
parent has the right to be informed of the content of the
individualized reading plan, any changes to the plan and
its implementation status;

(v) In its discretion, a school district may
implement paragraph (iii) of this subsection in whole or in
part before the start dates provided in that paragraph.

(j) For school districts not identified as high
performing schools districts:

(i) Each school district shall select and
implement a reading assessment and intervention program
that uses an instrument identified by the state
superintendent that screens for signs of reading
SF0178

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0348
difficulties not less than three (3) times per year in
kindergarten through grade three (3) and that implements
with fidelity an evidence based intervention program. The
program shall include instruments identified by the state
superintendent that monitor and measure reading progress
and assess student reading skills and progress to provide
data that informs any intervention. The assessment and
intervention program shall be administered to all students
in kindergarten through grade three (3). The program shall
also include implementation of evidence based core
curricula aligned to the uniform content and performance
standards and evidenced based interventions to meet the
needs of all students. The program shall be multi-tiered
and shall include evidence based interventions to
facilitate remediation of any reading difficulty as early
as possible;

(ii) Each school district shall notify parents
of student performance and develop and individualized
reading plan for students identified in need of further
reading intervention through diagnostic assessment, within
fifteen (15) calendar days after the screening is conducted
pursuant to paragraph (i) of this subsection, each school
SF0178

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0348
district shall provide a copy of the screening results,
including an explanation of the screening results, to the
parent of a student showing signs of reading difficulties
or not showing appropriate reading competence;

(iii) Commencing with school year 2025-2026 for
kindergarten and grade one (1) and commencing with school
year 2026-2027 for grade two (2) students showing signs of
reading difficulties or not showing appropriate reading
competence shall be placed on an individualized reading
plan developed, if possible, with the student's parents to
target the reading related difficulties that shall remain
in the student's academic record until the student achieves
reading competency and shall include all of the following:

(A) The specific reading deficiencies
requiring remediation;

(B) Goals and benchmarks for attaining
reading competency;

(C) Instructional services and
interventions that the student shall receive;
SF0178

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0348

(D) A scientifically and evidence-based
reading instruction program;

(E) A plan for monitoring and evaluating
the student's progress;

(F) If appropriate, a parent read-at-home
plan for families of students identified with a reading
difficulty which includes strategies that target students'
need based on data and that are aligned to the reading
science;

(G) Any additional services the educational
team, including the parents, deem appropriate to accelerate
the student's reading skills development.

(iv) The school district shall provide a copy of
a student's individualized reading plan to the student's
parent and shall consider any comments or suggestions the
parent has concerning the plan. Commencing with school year
2025-2026, the individualized reading plan for students in
kindergarten through grade two (2) shall, at the request of
SF0178

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0348
the parent, include retention of the student with reading
difficulties in the same grade and, for students in grades
one (1) or two (2), include repeating identified courses or
coursework;

(v) Commencing with school year 2027-2028 for
grade three (3), if a student's score on the grade three
(3) English language arts portion of the assessment is
basic or below basic, the school district notification
pursuant to paragraph (ii) of this subsection shall include
an invitation to meet with the student's teacher and other
appropriate school personnel to help develop a plan to
address that student's reading problem. The notification
shall state that if the parent and school district cannot
develop an individualized reading plan, the plan shall
include retaining the student in grade three (3). The
individualized reading plan shall include retaining the
student in grade three (3) if the parent and the school
district cannot agree on an alternate plan and may include
retaining the student in grade three (3) with agreement of
the parent. The plan shall be based on an understanding of
the individual student's difficulties with reading and
SF0178

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0348
shall include the plan elements in paragraph (iii) of this
subsection that are appropriate and may include:

(A) Having the student repeat identified
courses or coursework while advancing to the next grade;

(B) Having the student attend a summer
school program that is appropriate to remedy the student's
difficulties with reading;

(C) Securing and paying the cost for a
private tutor. The educational interventions afforded under
this subparagraph may be requested by a parent and shall
not be included without the written consent of the parent;

(D) Other provisions and interventions as
may be useful.

(vi) Commencing with school year 2028-2029 for
grade four (4), if the student's score is basic or below
basic on the English language arts portion of the
assessment, the school district notification shall include
an invitation to meet with the student's teacher and other
SF0178

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0348
appropriate school personnel to address that student's
reading problem. The individualized reading plan shall be
based on an understanding of the individual student's
difficulties with reading and shall include retaining the
student in grade four (4), except that if the student's
score was proficient or advanced on the grade three (3)
English language arts portion of the assessment or the
student was identified as an English language learner with
less than two (2) years of instruction in the English
language learner program at the time the assessment was
administered, the retention in grade four (4) is optional.
The individualized reading plan shall include the plan
elements in paragraph (iii) of this subsection that are
appropriate and may include the following:

(A) Having the student repeat identified
courses or coursework while advancing to the next grade;

(B) Having the student attend a summer
school program that is appropriate to remedy the student's
difficulties with reading;

SF0178

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0348
(C) Securing and paying the cost for a
private tutor. The educational interventions afforded under
this subparagraph may be requested by a parent and shall
not be included without the written consent of the parent;

(D) Other provisions and interventions as
may be useful.

(k) No student shall be retained pursuant to this
section for more than one (1) school year in grade three
(3) for a total of two (2) school years in grade three (3).
No student shall be retained pursuant to this section for
more than two (2) school years in grade four (4) for a
total of three (3) school years in grade four (4). In these
instances, the school district shall continue to notify
parents and develop individualized reading plans until the
student's score is proficient or advanced on the English
language arts portion of the assessment or leaves school.

(m) Except for high performing school districts as
defined by paragraph (e)(iv) of this section, each school
district shall annually report to the department of
education on the progress of each school in the school
SF0178

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0348
district towards achieving the goal of sixty percent (60%)
of all grade three (3) students that score proficient or
advanced on the grade three (3) English language arts
portion of the assessment. Each school district that is not
a high performing school district shall submit an
improvement plan to the department of education. The
department of education shall promulgate rules prescribing
the form and content to be included in a school district's
improvement plan.

(n) To assist in implementing the provisions of this
section, the state superintendent shall:

(i) In consultation with school districts and
appropriate professionals, promulgate rules as necessary or
useful to administer this section;

(ii) Directly support schools and school
districts in administering this section and meeting the
goals of improvement plans developed pursuant to subsection
(m) of this section. The principal purpose of the
operations research staff created pursuant to subsection
SF0178

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0348
(u) of this section shall be to enable the state
superintendent to carry out this function.

(e)(o) Commencing with school year 2022-2023, each
school district shall require each district employee
providing instruction in grades kindergarten through three
(3) within the district to have received or receive
professional development in evidence based literacy
instruction and intervention and in identifying the signs
of reading difficulties, including but not limited to
dyslexia and other reading deficiencies, using suitable
materials reviewed and required pursuant to rule by the
state superintendent. The rules required under subsection
(d) paragraph (n)(i) of this section shall establish
minimum reading assessment and intervention professional
development requirements to be completed not less than once
every three (3) years as required under this subsection for
district employees providing instruction in grades
kindergarten through three (3). The rules shall contain
criteria to identify appropriate and suitable professional
development materials for district employees in evidence
based literacy instruction and intervention and in
SF0178

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0348
detection of reading difficulties, including but not
limited to dyslexia and other reading deficiencies.

(p) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a
school district fails to provide the notice required under
subsection (h) or (j) of this section or fails to develop
or implement an individualized reading plan required under
subsection (h) or (j) of this section, a parent shall have
a cause of action against the school district for relief
subject to the following:

(i) Monetary damages may be recovered to fund
diagnostic testing, evaluation, individualized reading plan
development and plan implementation for the student;

(ii) The damages may include not more than ten
thousand dollars ($10,000.00) in attorney's fees and court
costs. Attorney's fees shall not be awarded if the payment
or amount of attorney's fees by the parent is contingent on
the outcome of the case;

(iii) The total monetary damages that may be
awarded in each case is limited to the average per pupil
SF0178

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0348
Wyoming state and local expenditures incurred in the
previous fiscal year;

(iv) In addition to monetary damages for failure
in whole or in part to implement a plan, the court may
order the school district to implement an individualized
reading plan developed and approved by the court. This plan
may include, with the consent of the parent, private
tutoring.

(q) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a
school district implements an individualized reading plan
required pursuant to this section that fails to reasonably
and appropriately address a student's reading difficulties,
or a parent disagrees with an individualized reading plan
proposed by a district and is unable to reach agreement
with the district, the parent may have a cause of action
against a school district. The court may order changes to
the plan reasonably needed to achieve the goal of enabling
the student to read well enough for the student to be able
to achieve a score of proficient or advanced on the English
language arts portion of the assessment or the court may
find the student cannot reasonably be expected to achieve
SF0178

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0348
this goal. In an action pursuant to this subsection, a
parent is not entitled to monetary damages or attorney's
fees.

(r) Actions pursuant to subsections (p) and (q) of
this section shall be brought in the district court in the
county in which the school district involved is
headquartered.

(s) The department of education shall not discontinue
the English language arts portion of the assessment or
substantially change the meaning of the scores
distinguishing between basic and below basic on the English
language arts portion of the assessment.

(t) There is created within the department of
education an operations research staff. The primary purpose
of this staff is to assist in the implementation of this
section and to conduct studies and assist school districts
in improving the performance of students in learning how to
ready adequately in primary grades. Duties of the staff
shall include the following:

SF0178

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0348
(i) Conduct management audits of school
districts selected by the state superintendent to
facilitate implementation of this section;

(ii) Conduct other studies requested by the
state superintendent to facilitate implementation of this
section and improve the functioning of school districts;

(iii) Provide technical assistance to the
districts in implementing this section;

(iv) Complete other studies and tasks relating
to education as assigned by the state superintendent.

(u) In managing the state department of education,
the state superintendent shall have the following duties
and authority:

(i) Shall have the authority to manage the
operations research staff and assign its work priorities
and tasks, to the extent not set by this section;

SF0178

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0348
(ii) Shall have the authority, exempt from the
requirements of the state personnel system, to define the
job description, position on the state salary scale and
hire, fire or transfer the manager of the operation
research staff and other comparable managers in the
department who report directly to the state superintendent;

(iii) For the senior operations research staff,
have the authority to, exempt from the requirements of the
state personnel system, set the job description, determine
the position of the state salary scale and hire or fire
individual employees;

(iv) May, to the extent funds are appropriated,
have the operations research staff contract with outside
consultants for all or a portion of the tasks assigned to
it and manage those contracts;

(v) Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-3207(a) through
(c), may transfer funds and utilize any department of
education staff to carry out the duties outlined in
subsection (t) of this section.

SF0178

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0348
(w) The long term goal for student performance
pursuant to this section shall be eighty-five percent (85%)
of the students score proficient or advanced on the English
language arts portion of the assessment.

Section 2. W.S. 21-3-401(a) through (d) is repealed.

Section 3. Effective school year 2025-2026 and each
school year thereafter, the assessment scores to determine
below basic, basic, proficient and advanced on the English
language arts portion of the statewide summative assessment
administered pursuant to W.S. 21-2-304(a)(v) shall not be
modified.

Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0178